es: Electrónica > Video > Transmisores de vídeo: Codificadores AV sobre IP; Transmisores de video FPV; Extensores HDBaseT; Extensores HDMI inalámbricos
nb: Elektronikk > Video > Videosendere: AV over IP-kodere; FPV-videosendere; HDBaseT-forlengere; Trådløse HDMI-forlengere
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 視訊/影音 > 視訊發射器: IP 影音編碼器; 第一人稱視角影片發射器; HDBaseT 延長器; 無線 HDMI 延長器
tr: Elektronik > Video > Video Vericileri: AV Over IP Kodlayıcıları; FPV Video Vericileri; HDBaseT Genişleticileri; Kablosuz HDMI Genişleticileri
fi: Elektroniikka > Video > Videolähettimet: AV Over IP -enkooderi; FPV-videolähetin; HDBaseT-jatkaja; Langaton HDMI-jatkaja
hr-HR: Elektronika > Video > Videoodašiljači: AVoIP enkoderi; FPV videoodašiljači; HDBaseT pojačivači; Bežični HDMI pojačivači
ja: 電子機器 > ビデオ > ビデオトランスミッター: AV over IPエンコーダー; FPV映像送信機; HDBaseTエクステンダー; ワイヤレスHDMIエクステンダー
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Video > Thiết bị truyền tín hiệu video: Bộ mã hóa AV qua IP; Bộ phát video FPV; Bộ mở rộng HDBaseT; Bộ mở rộng HDMI không dây
sv: Elektronik > Video > Videosändare/mottagare: AV över IP-kodare; FPV-videosändare; HDBaseT-förlängare; Trådlösa HDMI-förlängare
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Vídeo > Transmissores vídeo: Codificadores AV sobre IP; Transmissores de vídeo FPV; Extensores HDBaseT; Extensores HDMI sem fios
sk-SK: Elektronika > Video zariadenia > Video vysielače: AV over IP enkodéry; FPV video vysielače; HDBaseT predlžovače; Bezdrôtové HDMI predlžovače
de: Elektronik > Video > Videotransmitter: AV-over-IP-Encoder; FPV-Videosender; HDBaseT-Extender; Drahtlose HDMI-Extender
da: Elektronik > Video > Videosendeapparater: AV over IP-kodere; FPV-videosendere; HDBaseT-forlængere; Trådløse HDMI-forlængere
ko: 전자기기 > 비디오 > 비디오 송신기: AV 오버 IP 인코더; FPV 비디오 송신기; HDBaseT 익스텐더; 무선 HDMI 익스텐더
ru: Электроника > Видеоаппаратура > Видеопередатчики: Кодеры AV over IP; Видеопередатчики FPV; Удлинители HDBaseT; Беспроводные удлинители HDMI
pl: Elektronika > Video > Transmitery wideo: Kodery AV over IP; Nadajniki wideo FPV; Przedłużacze HDBaseT; Przedłużacze bezprzewodowego HDMI
hu: Elektronika > Videó > Videóadók: AV Over IP kódolók; FPV-videóadók; HDBaseT-hosszabbítók; Vezeték nélküli HDMI-hosszabbítók
en: Electronics > Video > Video Transmitters: AV Over IP Encoders; FPV Video Transmitters; HDBaseT Extenders; Wireless HDMI Extenders
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Βίντεο > Πομποί βίντεο: Κωδικοποιητές AV Over IP; Πομποί βίντεο FPV; Επεκτάσεις HDBaseT; Ασύρματες επεκτάσεις HDMI
nl: Elektronica > Video > Videotransmitters: Av over ip-encoders; Fpv-videozenders; Hdbaset-extenders; Draadloze hdmi-extenders
ro-RO: Electronice > Video > Transmițătoare video: Codificatoare AV peste IP; Transmițătoare video FPV; Prelungitoare HDBaseT; Prelungitoare HDMI fără fir
fr: Appareil électronique > Vidéo > Transmetteurs vidéo: Encodeurs AV sur IP; Émetteurs vidéo FPV; Extendeurs HDBaseT; Extendeurs HDMI sans fil
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Vídeo > Transmissores AV: Codificadores AV sobre IP; Transmissores de vídeo FPV; Extensores HDBaseT; Extensores HDMI sem fio
it: Elettronica > Video > Videotrasmettitori: Encoder AV su IP; Trasmettitori video FPV; Estensori HDBaseT; Estensori wireless HDMI
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 视频 > 视频发射器: AV over IP 编码器; FPV 视频发射器; HDBaseT 延长器; 无线 HDMI 延长器
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > วิดีโอ > เครื่องส่งสัญญาณวิดีโอ: เครื่องเข้ารหัสสัญญาณภาพและเสียงผ่านเครือข่าย; เครื่องส่งสัญญาณวิดีโอ FPV; ตัวขยายสัญญาณ HDBaseT; ตัวขยายสัญญาณ HDMI ไร้สาย
lt-LT: Elektronika > Vaizdo įranga > Vaizdo siųstuvai: AV Over IP kodavimo įrenginiai; FPV vaizdo siųstuvai; HDBaseT prailgintuvai; Belaidžiai HDMI prailgintuvai
sl-SI: Elektronika > Video > Video oddajniki: AV over IP kodirniki; FPV video oddajniki; HDBaseT podaljševalci; Brezžični HDMI podaljševalci
cs: Elektronika > Video > Zařízení pro přenos videa: AV Over IP enkodéry; FPV video vysílače; HDBaseT prodlužovače; Bezdrátové HDMI prodlužovače
bg-BG: Електроника > Видео > Видео предаватели: AV Over IP шифратори; FPV видео предаватели; HDBaseT удължители; Безжични HDMI удължители